src-fst-phonetics-txt2ipa.xfscript.md
|   Description                       | SAMPA     | IPA |  Unicode
| ----------------------------------- | --------- | --- | ---------
|   retroflex plosive, voiceless		 | t` [^1]   |  ʈ  | 0288, 648
|   retroflex plosive, voiced		 | d` [^1]   |  ɖ  | 0256, 598
|   labiodental nasal				 | F         |  ɱ  | 0271, 625
|   retroflex nasal					 | n` [^1]   |  ɳ  | 0273, 627
|   palatal nasal					 | J         |  ɲ  | 0272, 626
|   velar nasal						 | N         |  ŋ  | 014B, 331
|   uvular nasal						 | N\        |  ɴ  | 0274, 628
|   bilabial trill					 | B\        |  ʙ  | 0299, 665
|   uvular trill						 | R\        |  ʀ  | 0280, 640
|   alveolar tap						 | 4         |  ɾ  | 027E, 638
|   retroflex flap					 | r` [^1]   |  ɽ  | 027D, 637
|   bilabial fricative, voiceless	 | p\        |  ɸ  | 0278, 632
|   bilabial fricative, voiced		 | B         |  β  | 03B2, 946
|   dental fricative, voiceless		 | T         |  θ  | 03B8, 952
|   dental fricative, voiced			 | D         |  ð  | 00F0, 240
|   postalveolar fricative, voiceless | S         |  ʃ  | 0283, 643
|   postalveolar fricative, voiced	 | Z         |  ʒ  | 0292, 658
|   retroflex fricative, voiceless	 | s` [^1]   |  ʂ  | 0282, 642
|   retroflex fricative, voiced		 | z` [^1]   |  ʐ  | 0290, 656
|   palatal fricative, voiceless		 | C         |  ç  | 00E7, 231
|   palatal fricative, voiced		 | j\        |  ʝ  | 029D, 669
|   velar fricative, voiced	         | G         |  ɣ  | 0263, 611
|   uvular fricative, voiceless		 | X         |  χ  | 03C7, 967
|   uvular fricative, voiced			 | R         |  ʁ  | 0281, 641
|   pharyngeal fricative, voiceless	 | X\        |  ħ  | 0127, 295
|   pharyngeal fricative, voiced		 | ?\        |  ʕ  | 0295, 661
|   glottal fricative, voiced		 | h\        |  ɦ  | 0266, 614
|                                     |           |     | 
|   alveolar lateral fricative, vl.	 | K         |     | 
|   alveolar lateral fricative, vd.	 | K\        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   labiodental approximant			 | P (or v\ )|     | 
|   alveolar approximant				 | r\        |     | 
|   retroflex approximant			 | r\\` [^1] |     | 
|   velar approximant				 | M\        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   retroflex lateral approximant	 | l` [^1]   |     | 
|   palatal lateral approximant		 | L         |     | 
|   velar lateral approximant		 | L\        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Clicks**                        |           |     | 
|   bilabial							 | O\        |     | (O = capital letter) 
|   dental							 | \|\       |     | 
|   (post)alveolar					 | !\        |     | 
|   palatoalveolar					 | =\        |     | 
|   alveolar lateral					 | \|\|\     |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Ejectives, implosives**         |           |     | 
|   ejective							 | \_>       |     | e.g. ejective p  = p\_>
|   implosive						 | \_<       |     | e.g. implosive b = b\_<
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Vowels**                        |           |     | 
|   close back unrounded				 | M         |     | 
|   close central unrounded 			 | 1         |     | 
|   close central rounded			 | }         |     | 
|   lax i							 | I         |     | 
|   lax y							 | Y         |     | 
|   lax u							 | U         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   close-mid front rounded			 | 2         |     | 
|   close-mid central unrounded		 | @\        |     | 
|   close-mid central rounded		 | 8         |     | 
|   close-mid back unrounded			 | 7         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   schwa	ə						 | @         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   open-mid front unrounded			 | E         |     | 
|   open-mid front rounded			 | 9         |     | 
|   open-mid central unrounded		 | 3         |     | 
|   open-mid central rounded			 | 3\        |     | 
|   open-mid back unrounded			 | V         |     | 
|   open-mid back rounded			 | O         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   ash (ae digraph)					 | {         |     | 
|   open schwa (turned a)			 | 6         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   open front rounded				 | &         |     | 
|   open back unrounded	        	 | A         |     | 
|   open back rounded				 | Q         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Other symbols**                 |           |     | 
|   voiceless labial-velar fricative	 | W         |     | 
|   voiced labial-palatal approx.	 | H         |     | 
|   voiceless epiglottal fricative	 | H\        |     | 
|   voiced epiglottal fricative		 | <\        |     | 
|   epiglottal plosive				 | >\        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   alveolo-palatal fricative, vl. 	 | s\        |     | 
|   alveolo-palatal fricative, voiced | z\        |     | 
|   alveolar lateral flap			 | l\        |     | 
|   simultaneous S and x				 | x\        |     | 
|   tie bar							 | _         |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Suprasegmentals**               |           |     | 
|   primary stress					 | "         |     | 
|   secondary stress					 | %         |     | 
|   long								 | :         |     | 
|   half-long						 | :\        |     | 
|   extra-short						 | _X        |     | 
|   linking mark						 | -\        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   **Tones and word accents**        |           |     | 
|   level extra high					 | _T        |     | 
|   level high						 | _H        |     | 
|   level mid						 | _M        |     | 
|   level low						 | _L        |     | 
|   level extra low					 | _B        |     | 
|   downstep							 | !         |     | 
|   upstep							 | ^	     |     | (caret, circumflex)
|                                     |           |     | 
|   contour, rising					 | _R        |     | 
|   contour, falling					 | _F        |     | 
|   contour, high rising				 | _H_T      |     | 
|   contour, low rising				 | _B_L      |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   contour, rising-falling			 | _R_F      |     | (NB Instead of being written as diacritics with _, all prosodic marks can alternatively be placed in a separate tier, set off by < >, as recommended for the next two symbols.)
|                                     |           |     | 
|   global rise						 | \<R>      |     | 
|   global fall						 | \<F>      |     | 
|   									 |           |     | 
|   **Diacritics**					 |           |     | 
|   									 |           |     | 
|   voiceless						 | _0        |     | (0 = figure), e.g. n_0
|   voiced							 | _v        |     | 
|   aspirated						 | _h        |     | 
|   more rounded						 | _O        |     | (O = letter) 
|   less rounded						 | _c        |     | 
|   advanced							 | _+        |     | 
|   retracted						 | _-        |     | 
|   centralized						 | _"        |     | 
|   syllabic							 | = (or _=) |     | e.g. n= (or n_=) 
|   non-syllabic						 | _^        |     | 
|   rhoticity						 | `         |     | 
|   									 |           |     | 
|   breathy voiced					 | _t        |     | 
|   creaky voiced					 | _k        |     | 
|   linguolabial						 | _N        |     | 
|   labialized						 | _w        |     | 
|   palatalized						 | ' (or _j) |     | e.g. t' (or t_j) 
|   velarized						 | _G        |     | 
|   pharyngealized					 | _?\       |     | 
|   									 |           |     | 
|   dental							 | _d        |     | 
|   apical							 | _a        |     | 
|   laminal							 | _m        |     | 
|   nasalized						 | ~ (or _~) |     | e.g. A~ (or A_~) 
|   nasal release					 | _n        |     | 
|   lateral release					 | _l        |     | 
|   no audible release				 | _}        |     | 
|                                     |           |     | 
|   velarized or pharyngealized		 | _e        |     | 
|   velarized l, alternatively		 | 5         |     | 
|   raised							 | _r        |     | 
|   lowered							 | _o        |     | 
|   advanced tongue root				 | _A        |     | 
|   retracted tongue root			 | _q        |     | 

[^1]: `` ` ``  = ASCII 096

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript)</small>

---
